Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5194.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-33-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-33 entitled "Property Tax
Relief" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-33-9. Computation of credit.
The amount of any claim made pursuant to this chapter shall be determined as follows:
(1) For any taxable year, a claimant is entitled to a credit against his or her tax liability
equal to the amount by which the property taxes accrued or rent constituting property taxes accrued
upon the claimant’s homestead for the taxable year exceeds a certain percentage of the claimant’s
total household income for that taxable year, which percentage is based upon income level and
household size. The credit shall be computed in accordance with the following table:
Income Range 1 Person 2 or More Persons
less than $6000 3% 3%
$6001-9000 4% 4%
$9001-12000 5% 5%
$12001-15000 6% 5%
$15001-35000 50000 6% 6%
(2) The maximum amount of the credit granted under this chapter will be as follows:
Year Credit Maximum
Commencing July 1977 $ 55.00
Commencing July 1978 $150.00

Commencing July 1979 $175.00
Commencing July 1980 $200.00
Commencing on July 1997 and subsequent years $250.00
Commencing on July 2006 $300.00
Commencing July 2007 and subsequent tax years ending on or before December 31, 2021,
the credit shall be increased, at a minimum, to the maximum amount to the nearest five dollars
($5.00) increment within the allocation of five one-hundredths of one percent (0.05%) of net
terminal income derived from video lottery games up to a maximum of five million dollars
($5,000,000) until a maximum credit of five hundred dollars ($500) is obtained pursuant to the
provisions of § 42-61-15. In no event shall the exemption in any fiscal year be less than the prior
fiscal year.
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, the maximum credit shall be six
hundred dollars ($600).
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the maximum credit shall be eight
hundred fifty dollars ($850).
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the income range provided pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section and the maximum credit granted pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section shall be adjusted by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban
Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined
as of September 30 of the prior calendar years. Said adjustment shall be compounded annually and
shall be rounded up to the nearest five dollar ($5.00) increment. In no event shall the income range
or the maximum credit in any tax year be less than the prior tax year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000541
========
LC000541 - Page 2 of 3